Utah statutes.
41-1a-230.6.   Registration checkoff for protecting access to public lands
and promoting off-highway vehicle education.
(1)  A person who applies for a motor vehicle registration or registration
renewal may designate a voluntary contribution of $2 for the purpose of:
(a)  protecting access to public lands by motor vehicle and off-highway
vehicle operators; and
(b)  educating the public about appropriate off-highway vehicle use.
(2)  This contribution shall be:
(a)  collected by the division;
(b)  treated as a voluntary contribution to the Off-highway Access and
Education Restricted Account created in Section 41-22-19.5 and not as a motor
vehicle or off-highway vehicle registration fee; and
(c)  transferred to the Off-highway Access and Education Restricted Account
created in Section 41-22-19.5 at least monthly, less actual administrative
costs associated with collecting and transferring the contributions.
(3)  In addition to the administrative costs deducted under Subsection (2)(c),
the division may deduct the first $1,000 collected to cover costs incurred to
change the registration form.
